Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.180

Amount of qualifying deposit of eligible account holder or supplemental eligible account holder.

(1) Unless otherwise provided in the plan of conversion, the amount of the qualifying deposit of an eligible account holder or supplemental eligible account holder shall be the total of the deposit balances in the eligible account holder's or supplemental eligible account holder's savings accounts in the converting savings bank as of the close of business on the eligibility record date or supplemental eligibility record date. However, the plan of conversion may provide that any savings accounts with total deposit balances of less than fifty dollars (or any lesser amount) shall not constitute a qualifying deposit.

(2) As used in this section, the term "savings account" includes a predecessor or successor account of a given savings account which is held only in the same right and capacity and on the same terms and conditions as the given savings account. However, the plan of conversion may provide for lesser requirements for consideration as a predecessor or successor account.

[ 1981 c 85 s 35.]